North Dakota statutes. TITLE 40 Municipal Government
CHAPTER 40-05 Powers of Municipalities
40-05-02.
Additional powers of city council and board of city commissioners.

The city council in a city operating under the council form of government and the board of city commissioners in a city operating under the commission system of government, in addition to the powers possessed by all municipalities, shall have power:

Street railway and railway tracks. To permit, regulate, or prohibit the locating, constructing, or laying of railway or street railway tracks in any street, alley, or public place, and any permission given to a street railway may not be for a longer period than fifty years.

Sale of milk. To license the sale of milk.

Lumber, wood, coal, hay, and merchandise — Municipal scales. To regulate the inspecting, weighing, and measuring of lumber, firewood, coal, hay, and other articles of merchandise; establish or purchase one or more city scales and to require dealers in hay, coal, firewood, or any other commodity, which, in the judgment of the governing body, should be weighed upon the city scales, to use such scales in the sale of such commodity; and charge a reasonable fee for the use of such scales.

Fences and party walls. To regulate partition fences and party walls.

Jail, house of correction, workhouse. To establish, maintain, and regulate a city jail, house of correction, and workhouse for the confinement and reformation of disorderly persons convicted of violating any city ordinance and to appoint necessary jailers and keepers.

Building permits. To provide by ordinance and to fix the fees for the issuance of building permits.

Building construction — Fire escapes. To prescribe the manner of constructing buildings, structures, and the walls thereof, require and regulate the construction of fire escapes on buildings, and provide for the inspection of all buildings within the limits of the municipality and for the appointment of a building inspector.

Bridges, viaducts, tunnels, and overhead pedestrian bridges. To construct, keep in repair, and regulate the use of bridges, viaducts, overhead pedestrian bridges, and tunnels.

Police. To regulate the police of the municipality and to pass and enforce all necessary police ordinances.

Hospitals and medical dispensaries. To establish, control, and regulate hospitals and medical dispensaries.

Census. To provide for the taking of a census of the city, but no city census may be taken more often than once in every three years.

Redistricting city. To redistrict the city into wards and to prescribe the boundaries thereof.

Zoning. To adopt a zoning ordinance as provided in this title; regulate the location of junk shops, coalyards, garages, machine shops, power laundries, hospitals, and undertaking establishments; and establish building lines fixing the distance from the property line at which buildings may be erected.

Traffic regulation. To regulate, control, or restrict within designated zones, or congested traffic districts, except that the speed limit for vehicles on those streets designated as part of any state highway must be as determined by mutual agreement with the director of the department of transportation, the use of streets, alleys, or other public ways by various classes of traffic.

Driving while intoxicated. To prohibit by ordinance the operation of any motor vehicle or other conveyance upon the streets, alleys, or other public or private areas to which the public has a right of access for vehicular use within the city by any person under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance.

Tourist camps. To license, regulate, and fix the location of any public or private tourist camp within the city.

Water supply. To withdraw from any stream, watercourse, or body of water within or without a city, or within or without, or bordering upon, this state, a supply of water reasonably sufficient for the needs of the inhabitants of the city, and to supply the facilities for the storage of water for all other necessary municipal purposes.

Dams for municipal water purposes. To erect dams upon or across streams, watercourses, or bodies of water within or without, or bordering upon, the boundaries of this state, and to improve, alter, or protect the bed, banks, or course thereof.

Water supply — Acquire necessary property. To acquire by gift, grant, lease, easement, purchase, or, subject to chapter 32-15, by eminent domain, and to own, operate, maintain, and improve, all lands, structures, power plants, public works, and personal property, whether within or without this state, necessary for the maintenance and conservation of its water supply.

Abandoned or unclaimed personal property. To provide by ordinance for the taking, storage, and disposal of any personal property abandoned or left unclaimed upon the streets, alleys, or other public ways of the city for a period exceeding ten days, and, after holding such property for a period of not less than sixty days, to sell the same at public sale after a notice published or posted at least ten days before the sale, and at such place, and in such manner as may be provided by ordinance. Upon the sale of the property, the city shall convey to the purchaser a merchantable title by a bill of sale. At any time within six months after the sale, the owner of the property, upon written application, is entitled to receive the proceeds of the sale from the city, less the necessary expense of taking, storing, and selling the property. The owner of the property may reclaim it at any time prior to the sale upon payment of the necessary expense of taking and storing.

Auditoriums and public buildings. To take charge of a fully completed auditorium or other property originally purchased or acquired for public use by public subscription, donation, sale of stock, or otherwise, if such auditorium or other property has been abandoned or lost by the original owner or owners, their successors or assigns, and to operate, maintain, repair, and keep such property for public use. In the ownership, management, use, or operation thereof, the city must be deemed to be exercising a governmental function.

Dogs. To license dogs, and to regulate the keeping of dogs, including authorization for their disposition or destruction in order to protect the health, safety, and general welfare of the public provided, however, that license fees are waived in the case of an assistance dog.

Substandard buildings or structures. The governing body of any city shall have the authority to provide by ordinance for the demolition, repair, or removal of any building or structure located within the limits of such city or other territory under its jurisdiction, which creates a fire hazard, is dangerous to the safety of the occupants or persons frequenting such premises, or is permitted by the owner to remain in a dilapidated condition. Any such ordinance must provide for written notice to the owner of a hearing by the governing body before final action is taken by such body. It must also provide a reasonable time within which an appeal may be taken by the owner from any final order entered by such governing body to a court of competent jurisdiction. The amount of the cost of any demolition, repair, or removal of a building or structure constitutes a lien against the real property from which the cost was incurred and the lien may be foreclosed in judicial proceedings in the manner provided by law for loans secured by liens on real property. If this amount is not adequate to cover the cost of demolition, repair, or removal, the city has a lien for the amount of the additional costs on all real property owned, or later acquired, by the owner in the city. If the city provides the amount of the lien and the name of the owner, the county auditor shall enter on the tax list the amount of the additional cost as a tax lien. The tax lien is enforceable by the city in the same manner as a tax lien by a county. This subsection in no way limits or restricts any authority which is now or may hereafter be vested in the state fire marshal for the regulation or control of such buildings or structures.

Assault and battery. To prohibit by ordinance and prescribe the punishment for the commission of assault and battery within the jurisdiction of the city.

Theft. To prohibit by ordinance and prescribe the punishment for the commission of theft, as defined by chapter 12.1-23, within the jurisdiction of the city.

Peace bonds. To provide by ordinance for the issuance of peace bonds by the municipal judge in accordance with the procedure in chapter 29-02.

Public transportation. To provide by ordinance for the purchase, acquisition, or establishment, and operation of a public transportation system. In the alternative, to provide for payments under a contract, approved by the governing body of the city, with a private contractor, for the provision and operation of a public transportation system within the city.

Traffic violation hearings. To enact an ordinance equivalent to section 39-06.1-04; provided, that the penalty assessed may not exceed that authorized by section 40-05-06.

Marijuana possession. To prohibit by ordinance any person, except a person operating a motor vehicle, from possessing not more than one ounce [28.35 grams] of marijuana, as defined by section 19-03.1-01, within the jurisdiction of a city, and to prescribe the punishment, provided the penalty assessed is subject to subsection 9 of section 19-03.1-23.

Establishment of administrative boards. To establish administrative boards or committees for the limited purpose of adjudicating a violation of a noncriminal city ordinance or noncriminal city code. An administrative board or committee may impose fines or other noncriminal penalties, including issuing orders of suspension and revocation of a permit or license. A decision by an administrative board or committee is subject to appeal to the governing body of the municipality.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 24, § 22; S.L. 1887, ch. 73, art. 4, § 1; 1887, ch. 106, § 1; 1890, ch. 100, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1895, §§ 2148, 2365; S.L. 1897, ch. 102, § 1; 1897, ch. 148, § 1; 1899, ch. 40, § 1; R.C. 1899, §§ 2148, 2365; S.L. 1905, ch. 62, § 47; 1905, ch. 186, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 2678, 2864; S.L. 1907, ch. 45, § 48; 1907, ch. 268, § 1; 1911, ch. 77, § 48; 1911, ch. 79, § 1; 1913, ch. 81, § 1; 1913, ch. 291, § 1; C.L. 1913, §§ 3599, 3818, 3861; S.L. 1933, ch. 175, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 40-0502; S.L. 1945, ch. 252, §§ 1, 2; 1957 Supp., § 40-0502; S.L. 1959, ch. 285, § 5; 1967, ch. 324, § 1; 1969, ch. 368, § 1; 1971, ch. 388, § 1; 1975, ch. 106, § 453; 1975, ch. 339, §§ 20, 21; 1981, ch. 408, § 1; 1983, ch. 455, § 1; 1987, ch. 73, § 25; 1987, ch. 490, § 1; 2001, ch. 258, § 7; 2007, ch. 293, § 18; 2009, ch. 347, § 1; 2015, ch. 278, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 164, § 12, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 187, § 8, effective August 1, 2019.

Cross-References.

Bridges, construction by board of county commissioners, see § 24-08-01.

Bridges, issuance of bonds to meet construction expenses of, see § 24-08-07.

Building permits, inspection of construction requiring, see § 54-21.2-04.

Highways, classification as to weight and load capacities, see § 39-12-01.

Hospital, permission to establish in residence block of city, see § 23-12-04.

Jails, see ch. 12-44.1.

Parking meters prohibited, see § 39-01-09.

Speed limitations, powers of local authorities, see § 39-09-03.

Traffic-control devices and parking signs, erection, see §§ 39-10-04, 39-13-03.

Subdivision 5.

Subdivision 6.

Subdivision 7.

Subdivision 8.

Subdivision 10.

Subdivision 13.

Subdivision 14.

Subdivision 15.

Subdivision 21.

Subdivision 22.

Subdivision 23.

40-05-02.1.
Parking privileges for handicapped. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 293, § 5.

40-05-02.2.
City may levy excise tax on nonprofit liquor dealers by ordinance.

Any city, through the enactment of an ordinance to such effect, may levy a local excise tax, not in excess of fifty percent, upon the proceeds from gross sales of liquor, as defined by subsection 6 of section 5-01-01, by any nonprofit corporation licensed by the city to sell such liquor; provided, however, that no city may levy the tax herein provided for unless such nonprofit corporation is the only person, firm, association, corporation, or limited liability company within the corporate limits of such city licensed to sell such liquor.

The city in levying the excise tax provided for in subsection 1 shall provide within the levying enactment a method of computation, collection, and disposition of such tax revenue, and a procedure whereby any person aggrieved by such procedure may appeal to the governing body of the city. The right of appeal from a decision of the governing body of such city to the district court of the district wherein such city is located may not be restricted. An appeal taken under this section must be in accordance with the procedure provided in section 28-34-01.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 289, § 1; 1967, ch. 323, § 117; 1989, ch. 83, § 14; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

40-05-03.
Cities having population of fifteen thousand may provide for regulation and inspection of food markets.

The governing body of any city having a population of fifteen thousand or more may enact ordinances providing for the regulation and inspection of food markets, stores, and other places where food intended for human consumption is sold at retail.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 201, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 40-0503; S.L. 1967, ch. 107, § 8.

Cross-References.

General regulation of food, see ch. 19-02.1.

40-05-04.
Powers of village. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 285.

40-05-05.
Cities may contract for electrical energy or gas.

The governing body of any city may enter into a contract with any person, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, or the United States or any department or agency thereof to provide for:

The furnishing of electrical energy or gas to the inhabitants of the city and to the city for all purposes; or

The sale to and the purchase by the city for a term of not to exceed ten years, of electrical energy or gas required for city purposes.

The making and execution of any such contract must be authorized by a resolution of the governing body adopted by a majority of the members thereof at a regularly assembled meeting of such body. Nothing contained in this section shall deprive the public service commission of any of its regulatory powers with reference to contract rates.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 173, §§ 2, 3; R.C. 1943, § 40-0505; S.L. 1951, ch. 260, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 40-0505; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 118; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

Cross-References.

Municipal power agencies, see ch. 40-33.2.

Municipal utilities, see ch. 40-33.

40-05-06.
City fines and penalties limited.

Except as provided in subsections 2 and 3, the fine or penalty for the violation of any ordinance, resolution, or regulation of a city may not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars, and the imprisonment may not exceed thirty days for one offense.

For every violation of a city ordinance that regulates the operation or equipment of a motor vehicle or which regulates traffic, except those ordinances listed in section 39-06.1-05, a fee may be established, by ordinance, which may exceed, by up to one hundred percent, the limit, for an equivalent category of violation, set forth in section 39-06.1-06.

For every violation of a city ordinance enforcing the requirements of title 40, Code of Federal Regulations, section 403 relating to publicly owned treatment works, or prohibiting shoplifting, vandalism, criminal mischief, or malicious mischief, the penalty may not exceed a fine of one thousand five hundred dollars, imprisonment for thirty days, or both such fine and imprisonment.

This section does not prohibit the use of the sentencing alternatives, other than a fine or imprisonment, provided by section 12.1-32-02 for the violation of a city ordinance, nor does this section limit the use of deferred or suspended sentences under subsections 3 and 4 of section 12.1-32-02.

Source:

S.L. 1877, ch. 73, art. 4, § 1; 1890, ch. 100, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1895, § 2148, subs. 77; S.L. 1897, ch. 102, § 1, subs. 76; 1899, ch. 40, § 1, subs. 77; R.C. 1899, § 2148, subs. 77; S.L. 1905, ch. 62, § 47, subs. 78; R.C. 1905, § 2678, subs. 78; S.L. 1907, ch. 45, § 48, subs. 73; 1911, ch. 77, § 48, subs. 73; C.L. 1913, §§ 3599 subs. 78, 3818 subs. 73; R.C. 1943, § 40-0506; S.L. 1969, ch. 369, § 1; 1973, ch. 301, § 33; 1975, ch. 368, § 1; 1981, ch. 409, § 1; 1989, ch. 158, § 15; 1991, ch. 443, § 1; 1997, ch. 132, § 3; 2013, ch. 301, § 22; 2019, ch. 335, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 516, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

40-05-07.
Village fines and penalties limited — Remission. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 285.

40-05-08.
Municipal licenses for sale of agricultural products limited — Exception.

No municipality shall impose any license fee or charge against the producer or grower of any agricultural product grown or produced upon lands located in this state nor in any manner limit or restrict the free sale thereof by such grower or producer. This provision, however, shall not restrict the right of any municipality to utilize any power given to it to regulate, as reasonable health measures, the inspection and sale of products intended for human consumption.

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 175, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 40-0508.

40-05-09.
Purchase of firefighting equipment — How paid — Limitations.

Upon a declaration by resolution duly passed that an emergency exists and that it is desirable and necessary that firefighting apparatus and equipment be acquired for municipal purposes, the governing body of any municipality may enter into a contract or contracts for the purchase of such property. The purchase price of such property may be payable in annual installments, but all moneys paid annually under any such contract shall be available and shall be paid from the authorized tax levy of the municipality. Under this section, contracts may not be entered into which will create aggregate future obligations of the municipality in an amount in excess of one percent of the value of all taxable property within the municipality and such contracts shall not be in excess of ten thousand dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 193, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 40-0509.

40-05-09.1.
Tax levy for fire department stations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 290, § 1; 1967, ch. 323, § 119; 1967, ch. 325, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 20; 1983, ch. 606, § 39; 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

40-05-09.2.
Contracting for fire protection service.

Any city may contract with a nonprofit corporation for the provision of fire protection and firefighting services if the nonprofit corporation has been in existence and has provided fire protection and firefighting services to the contracting city for a period of not less than twenty years.

The governing body of the city may provide funding from revenues derived from its general fund levy authority for contracted fire protection services and may also expend moneys otherwise available for the provision of such service.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 321, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 21; 1983, ch. 606, § 40; 2015, ch. 439, § 36, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

40-05-10.
Municipalities to have powers of townships.

In addition to the powers conferred by this title, each incorporated municipality shall have and shall exercise, within its limits and in the manner prescribed by law, the same powers as are conferred upon townships by the laws of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1883, ch. 112, § 121, subs. 1; R.C. 1895, § 2676; R.C. 1899, § 2676; R.C. 1905, § 3216; C.L. 1913, § 4272; R.C. 1943, § 40-0510.

Cross-References.

Powers of townships, see ch. 58-03.

40-05-11.
Foreign city — Power to acquire by right of eminent domain, purchase, lease, own, and hold real estate in this state — Liability.

Any city of another state situated within five miles [8.05 kilometers] of the boundary line of this state may purchase, lease, own, and hold real estate in this state for waterworks or sewerage purposes and may improve the land for municipal purposes in the same manner as a city situated in this state, and may lease, let, or convey the land. Any city so situated may acquire, by purchase, gift, devise, or, subject to chapter 32-15, condemnation, any property, corporeal or incorporeal within this state, as may be necessary or convenient for the construction and maintenance of an electric power transmission line, which electric power transmission line has the function of connecting a municipal power plant, owned and operated by that city, with distribution facilities owned by the government of the United States for distributing electric power generated at Garrison Dam. Such foreign city is liable for all damages growing out of or incident to the ownership, use, or occupation of any such real estate in this state as if it were a municipality of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1917, ch. 77, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3770a1; R.C. 1943, § 40-0511; S.L. 1955, ch. 260, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 40-0511; 2007, ch. 293, § 19.

40-05-12.
Foreign city — Power to sue and defend in courts of this state.

Any city of another state authorized by section 40-05-11 to own, lease, occupy, or hold real estate in this state shall have the same right as a city of this state to sue by its corporate authorities and in its corporate name in the courts of this state for the protection of any rights acquired in real estate in this state and to defend actions in its corporate name relating to the ownership, use, or occupation of real estate acquired.

Source:

S.L. 1917, ch. 77, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 3770a2; R.C. 1943, § 40-0512.

40-05-13.
Foreign city — Power to convey realty — Regulations governing.

Any real estate in this state owned by a city situated in another state may be conveyed by a warranty or quitclaim deed executed by and on behalf of such city in its corporate name by its executive officer and city auditor. The deed, when so executed and when acknowledged by the executive officer and city auditor for and on behalf of the city, before an officer competent to take acknowledgments, shall be entitled to record.

Source:

S.L. 1917, ch. 77, § 3; 1925 Supp., § 3770a3; R.C. 1943, § 40-0513; S.L. 1973, ch. 80, § 11.

40-05-14.
Agreements for construction and maintenance of streets between municipalities and counties.

The governing body of any municipality of ten thousand population or less and the boards of county commissioners of the several counties may enter into agreements for the construction and maintenance of streets within such municipalities by the boards of county commissioners. Said municipalities shall pay, on a reimbursable basis, such sums as are agreed upon.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 253, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-0514.

40-05-15.
Unclaimed motor vehicles — When sale permitted — Bill of sale evidence of title. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 319, § 15.

40-05-16.
Programs and activities for senior citizens — Expenditure of funds.

The governing body of any city is authorized to establish or maintain programs and activities for senior citizens, including the expansion of existing senior citizen centers which will provide recreational and other leisure-time activities, informational, health, welfare, counseling, and referral services for senior citizens, and assist such persons in providing volunteer community or civic services. The governing body is authorized to expend funds received from state, federal, or private sources for the public purposes provided for in this section. No expenditure authorized by this section shall be made to defray any expenses of any organization or agency until such organization or agency is incorporated under the laws of this state as a nonprofit corporation and has contracted with the governing body in regard to the manner in which such funds will be expended and the services to be provided. An organization or agency and its program which receives such funds shall be reviewed or approved annually by the governing body to determine its eligibility to receive funds under the provisions of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 96, § 2.

Cross-References.

State matching funds for senior citizens’ programs, see § 57-15-56.

40-05-17.
City restriction of adult establishments — Definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Adult bookstore” means a bookstore having as a preponderance of its publications, books, magazines, and other periodicals which are distinguished or characterized by their emphasis on matter depicting, describing, or relating to specified sexual activities or specified anatomical areas as defined in this subsection.

“Adult establishment” means either an adult bookstore, an adult motion picture theater, an adult mini-motion picture theater, or a massage business, all as defined in this subsection.

“Adult mini-motion picture theater” means an enclosed building with a capacity for less than fifty persons used for presenting motion pictures, a preponderance of which are distinguished or characterized by an emphasis on matter depicting, describing, or relating to specified sexual activities or specified anatomical areas as defined in this subsection, for observation by patrons of the theater.

“Adult motion picture theater” means an enclosed building with a capacity of fifty or more persons used for presenting motion pictures, a preponderance of which are distinguished or characterized by an emphasis on matter depicting, describing, or relating to specified sexual activities or specified anatomical areas as defined in this subsection, for observation by patrons of the theater.

“Massage” means the manipulation of body muscle or tissue by rubbing, stroking, kneading, or tapping, by hand or mechanical device.

“Massage business” means any establishment or business wherein massage is practiced, including establishments commonly known as health clubs, physical culture studios, massage studios, or massage parlors.

“Sexually oriented devices” means without limitation any artificial or simulated specified anatomical area or any other device or paraphernalia that is designed in whole or in part for specified sexual activities.

“Specified anatomical areas” means:

Less than completely and opaquely covered human genitals and pubic regions, buttocks, or female breasts below a point immediately above the top of the areola.

Human male genitals in a discernibly turgid state, even if completely and opaquely covered.

“Specified sexual activities” means:

Human genitals in a state of sexual stimulation or arousal;

Acts of human masturbation, sexual intercourse, or sodomy; or

Fondling or other erotic touchings of human genitals and pubic regions, buttocks, or female breasts.

A determination of preponderance need not be based on whether or not a numerical majority or plurality of the materials are distinguished or characterized by their emphasis on matter depicting, describing, or relating to specified sexual activities or specified anatomical areas. When making a determination as to whether an establishment displays, sells, distributes, or exhibits a preponderance of materials which are so distinguished or characterized, the governing body or factfinder shall consider the totality of the circumstances and may consider, among other factors deemed relevant, any of the following:

Dominant theme of the establishment.

Total impression of the emphasis placed on such materials by the establishment.

Externalities of the establishment including, the manner of packaging or display and advertising which demonstrates the dominant theme or emphasis being placed on such materials by the establishment.

Obtrusive characteristics of the materials which tend to distract from and dominate the other classes of materials.

Manner of display of the materials.

Advertising emphasis.

Whether the establishment prohibits minors from entering the premises or any portion thereof.

The governing body of any city may, by ordinance, provide that:

No building, premises, structure, or other facility that contains any adult establishment, as defined in subsection 1, shall contain any other kind of adult establishment.

No building, premises, structure, or other facility in which sexually oriented devices, as defined in subsection 1, are sold, distributed, exhibited, or contained shall contain any adult establishment, as defined in subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 143, §§ 1, 3; 1983, ch. 456, § 1.

Cross-References.

Obscenity control, see ch. 12.1-27.1.

40-05-18.
Garbage removal — Number of contractors allowed.

In any city with a population of not less than five thousand persons, the governing body shall, if permitted by ordinance or by law to allow more than one person or firm to contract with commercial enterprises for the private collection or removal of garbage, allow all persons or firms wishing to do so to enter into private garbage removal contracts with commercial enterprises.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 410, § 1.

40-05-19.
City funding for animal shelters — Sterilization of animals.

The governing body of the city may provide funding from revenues derived from its general fund levy authority for the construction, operation, or maintenance of animal shelters. Voter-approved levy authority authorized by electors of a city under this section before January 1, 2015, remains in effect through taxable year 2024 or for the time period authorized by the electors, whichever expires first.

The levy authorized by this section may be used to defray expenses of any organization or agency incorporated under the laws of this state as a nonprofit corporation that has contracted with the governing body of the city in regard to the manner in which the funds will be expended and the services will be provided. No unclaimed dog or cat may be released for adoption by an animal shelter that receives funds from the levy under this section without being first sterilized, or without a written agreement and deposit from the adopter guaranteeing that the animal will be sterilized.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 616, §§ 2, 3; 2015, ch. 439, § 37, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Collateral References.

Cat as object of larceny, 55 A.L.R.4th 1080.

40-05-20.
Programs and activities for handicapped persons — Expenditure of funds.

The governing body of any city or park district may establish or maintain programs and activities for handicapped persons, including recreational and other leisure-time activities and informational, health, welfare, transportation, counseling, and referral services. The governing body may provide funding from revenues derived from its general fund levy authority and may expend funds received from state, federal, or private sources for the public purposes provided for in this section. No expenditure may be made to defray any expenses of any organization or agency until the organization or agency is incorporated under the laws of this state as a nonprofit corporation and has contracted with the governing body in regard to the manner in which the funds will be expended and the services will be provided. An organization or agency that receives the funds must be reviewed or approved annually by the governing body to determine its eligibility to receive funds under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 149, § 2; 2015, ch. 439, § 38, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

40-05-21.
Centennial coordinating committee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 54, § 15.

40-05-22.
Golf carts on city streets.

The governing body of a city may allow by an ordinance the operation of golf carts on the city streets. The ordinance may not allow a golf cart on federal, state, or county highways in the city, except for the perpendicular crossing of these highways. The ordinance may not allow the operation of a golf cart on city streets except for daytime travel between the owner’s place of residence and a golf course. Golf carts that are allowed to operate on the city streets as the result of an ordinance are exempt from the title, registration, and equipment provisions of title 39.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 349, § 1.

40-05-23.
Limitation on authority — Seed.

Notwithstanding any other law, a city may not impose any requirements or restrictions pertaining to the registration, labeling, distribution, sale, handling, use, application, transportation, or disposal of seed. This section does not apply to city zoning ordinances.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 7.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2011.

40-05-24.
Duties of cities granting property tax incentives.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, before granting a property tax incentive on any parcel of property that is anticipated to receive a property tax incentive for more than five years, the governing body of a city shall send the chairman of each county commission and the president of each school district affected by the property tax incentive a letter, by certified mail, which provides notice of the terms of the proposed property tax incentive.

Within thirty days from receipt of the letter, each affected county and school district shall notify the city, in writing, whether the county or school district elects to participate in granting the tax incentive on the county or school district portion of tax levied on the property. The notification from a county or school district electing not to participate must include a letter explaining any reason for which the entity elected not to participate and whether the county or school district is willing to negotiate the terms of the property tax incentive with the city.

If the city does not receive a response from an affected county or school district within thirty days of delivery of the letter, the county and school district must be treated as participating in the property tax incentive.

The term “negotiation” as used in this section means the governing body of an affected county or school district may negotiate the terms of participating in the tax incentive, including the duration of the tax incentive and the taxable value selected for the base year for purposes of computing tax increments.

If an agreement is reached through negotiation under this section, the property tax incentive must be applied in accordance with the agreement.

Property subject to a development agreement entered pursuant to section 40-58-20.1 before August 1, 2017, and all amendments to the development agreement, is not subject to the requirements under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 277, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; S.L. 2017, ch. 14, §
22, eff for property tax incentives approved after July 31, 2017.